Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 17. Ranch A

History.

2018 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 36-8-1701.
Ranch A account; use of funds.

There is created the Ranch A account. The board of land commissioners shall deposit all earnings, whether from lease or otherwise, generated by state owned property commonly known as “Ranch A” to the account. The board may accept gifts from any individual or entity for Ranch A and shall deposit those funds to the account. Funds in the account from any source are continuously appropriated to the board for purposes of capital construction projects, major maintenance and maintenance of the outdoor recreation area and the facilities comprising Ranch A. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

and

9-4-207

, any earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the account and shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period.

As used in this section “Ranch A” means the following described property: In township 52 north, range 60 west, 6th p.m., section 18, lots 3, 4: SE1/4 SW1/4: SW1/4 SE1/4: 7.79 acres in NE1/4 SW1/4; section 19 lot 1, NE1/4 NW1/4. In township 52 north, range 61 west, 6th p.m., section 13: lot 4: W1/2 SE1/4: SE1/4 SE1/4; section 24 NE1/4 (less 1.0 acre): NE1/4 NW1/4: E1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4 SE1/4 less south 50 feet: W1/2 NW1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4 less south 50 feet. All containing six hundred twelve and ninety-four hundredths (612.94) acres more or less.

History.

2018 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 136, § 17, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.